Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Hindering Government Operations
§ 6-5-206.
Escape from official detention; penalties.

A person commits a crime if he escapes from official detention. Escape is:

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, if the detention is the result of a conviction for a felony;

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both, if the detention is the result of:

A conviction for a misdemeanor; or

An arrest or charge for a crime.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to escape of prisoners under the Western Interstate Corrections Compact, see §

7-3-401

.

As to escape from work release program, see §

7-16-309

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Specific intent. —

Supreme Court of Wyoming cannot find any indication in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-5-206(a)(i) or

7-18-112

that the legislature intended there to be a specific intent element to the crime of escape; it is a general intent crime.
Seymore v. State, 2007 WY 32, 152 P.3d 401,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2007), limited, Wyant v. State, 2020 WY 15, 458 P.3d 13,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2020).

Resisting arrest, escaping detention, differentiated. —

Where the defendant escaped while police officers attempted to arrest him, he was entitled to an instruction which differentiated between resisting arrest and escaping detention following an arrest. Oien v. State, 797 P.2d 544,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1990).

Escape from place other than jail building. —

This section proscribes escape by a person committed to the custody of the county jail. It is immaterial that an escape may actually be made from a place other than the building called the county jail, so long as the escapee was committed to the custody of the county jail at the time of the escape. Slaughter v. State, 629 P.2d 481,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1981).

Participation in community correctional program does not constitute “supervision on probation or parole”

that would preclude prosecution for the offense of escape from official detention. Peper v. State, 768 P.2d 26,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1989).

Temporary leave does not confer parole status. —

A prisoner committed “escape” for purposes of this section when he failed to return on time from a temporary leave granted him to talk with an attorney concerning a worker's compensation claim; his signing of a form captioned “Temporary Parole Agreement” before he was released did not convert his leave into parole. Westmark v. State, 864 P.2d 1031,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1993).

Prosecution not barred because of previous punishment imposedby prison. —

A criminal prosecution for prison escape is not barred by a plea of former jeopardy based on disciplinary punishment previously imposed by prison authorities for the same escape. Hamby v. State, 559 P.2d 1388,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1977).

Credit for time spent in Surveillance and Treatment Program.—

Where defendant was placed on probation and ordered to participate in Surveillance and Treatment of Offender Program (S.T.O.P.), defendant was not eligible for credit for the time spent in the program when her probation was revoked, since the defendant could not be charged with escape from S.T.O.P., and S.T.O.P. was not a community correctional center. Kupec v. State, 835 P.2d 359,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1992).

Credit for time in alcoholism treatment facility. —

When a probationer spends time at an alcoholism treatment facility as a condition of his probation, he is entitled to receive a credit for that time toward his sentence if a charge of escape from official detention will lie. Yellowbear v. State, 874 P.2d 241,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1994).

Where defendant was arrested for felony attempted larceny and released from pretrial custody to participate in a residential substance abuse treatment facility, defendant was not in official detention for purpose of this section and was not subject to a charge of escape from official detention; therefore, defendant was not entitled to credit against his prison sentence for that time period.
Morrison v. State, 2012 WY 41, 272 P.3d 321,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2012).

Dual sentences for aggravated assault and escape. —

The imposition of dual and consecutive sentences for aggravated assault (§

6-2-502

) and attempted escape (§§

6-5-206

and

6-1-304

) for a single violent escape attempt, which could have resulted in a single sentence under §

6-5-207

, did not violate double jeopardy constitutional provisions. Under the applicable statutory elements test, clearly different offenses were demonstrated, while the prosecutor had the requisite discretion to elect the charge or charges which could be brought based on the specific facts of the case. DeSpain v. State, 865 P.2d 584,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1993).

Sufficient evidence to convict. —

Evidence supported conviction for escape from official detention when defendant ran from courtroom, accessed stairwell and raced down four flights of steps; fact that defendant was apprehended in a short time did not reduce defendant's actions to attempted escape. Capshaw v. State, 958 P.2d 387,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1998).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction for escape. Although there was no direct evidence of where defendant was during the hours he was missing from a work site, the circumstantial evidence was sufficient to allow the jury to conclude beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant left his place of employment.
Martin v. State, 2007 WY 2, 149 P.3d 707,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2007).

Illegal sentence for underlying offense. —

While a 365-day sentence was clearly illegal as the maximum for defendant's third driving under the influence conviction was six months under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(e), defendant had not yet served six months, the legal portion of his sentence, when he allegedly escaped. Thus, the prosecution on an escape charge under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-206(a)(ii)(A) was acceptable.
Crosby v. State, 2011 WY 44, 247 P.3d 876,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2011).

Jury instructions. —

Defendant who was charged with attempting to escape from official detention, conspiring to escape from official detention, and felony murder during an attempt to escape from official detention, which were all based upon this section, was not entitled to a jury instruction defining “escape” and thus appellate counsel was not deficient in failing to raise the issue since nothing about the word “escape” or its usage in the statute suggests the word has a technical legal meaning, and there was nothing about the facts that would have confused the jury as to the word's import. Harlow v. State, 2005 WY 12, 105 P.3d 1049,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 835, 126 S. Ct. 63, 163 L. Ed. 2d 90, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 6229 (U.S. 2005).

Prosecutorial misconduct. —

Cumulative effect of an instructional error and the prosecutor's misstatements was prejudicial error, where it was not clear whether defendant was convicted just upon the evidence presented because, inter alia, the prosecutor told the jury panel during voir dire: (1) “I think” the evidence showed defendant was guilty; (2) that defendant “should” bring any exculpatory evidence into court and present it to the jury; and (3) the State did not have to prove any mens rea element of the crime.
Seymore v. State, 2007 WY 32, 152 P.3d 401,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2007), limited, Wyant v. State, 2020 WY 15, 458 P.3d 13,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2020).

Jury not instructed prohibited conduct had to be undertakenvoluntarily. —

Conviction for escape was reversed where cumulative effect of an instructional error and the prosecutor's misstatements Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-206(a)(i) created verdict that could not be trusted, because the jury had not been instructed that it had to find that appellant had acted voluntarily; even a general intent crime required a showing that the prohibited conduct was undertaken voluntarily.
Seymore v. State, 2007 WY 32, 152 P.3d 401,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2007), limited, Wyant v. State, 2020 WY 15, 458 P.3d 13,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2020).

Applied

in

Angerhofer v. State, 758 P.2d 1041,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1988); Phillips v. State, 760 P.2d 388,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1988); Smith v. State, 932 P.2d 1281,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Jenkins v. State, 2002 WY 107, 49 P.3d 1028,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2002); Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003); Hagen v. State, 2014 WY 141,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Nov. 5, 2014).

Cited

in

Young v. State, 904 P.2d 359,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1995); Major v. State, 2004 WY 4, 83 P.3d 468,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2004); Endris v. State, 2010 WY 73, 233 P.3d 578,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(June 3, 2010); Turner v. State, 2015 WY 29,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Feb. 25, 2015).

Jones v. State, 2006 WY 40, 132 P.3d 162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. Apr. 6, 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What justifies escape or attempt to escape or assistance in that regard, 70 ALR2d 1430.

Means employed to effect it as affecting escape or prison breach, 96 ALR2d 520.

Escape from public employee or institution other than correctional or law enforcement employee or institution as criminal offense, 69 ALR3d 625.

Duress, necessity or conditions of confinement as justification for escape from prison, 69 ALR3d 678.

Conviction for escape where prisoner fails to leave confines of prison or institution, 79 ALR4th 1060.

Duress, necessity, or conditions of confinement as justification for escape from prison, 54 ALR5th 141.

Effect of escape from state custody on petitioner's rights in federal habeas corpus proceedings, 61 ALR Fed 938.

Sufficiency of evidence of instigating or assisting escape from federal custody, under 18 USC § 752(a), 74 ALR Fed 816.

Excessiveness of sentence, under 18 USC § 751(a), for escape from federal custody, 77 ALR Fed 318.

What constitutes “custody” under 18 USC § 751(a) defining offense of escape from custody, 114 ALR Fed 581.

§ 6-5-207.
Escape by violence or assault, or while armed; penalty.

A person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years if he escapes from official detention by violence or while armed with a deadly weapon or by assault upon a person in charge of the detention.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to assault and aggravated assault and battery, see §§

6-2-501

and

6-2-502

.

As to weapons, see chapter 8 of this title.

Dual sentences for aggravated assault and escape. —

The imposition of dual and consecutive sentences for aggravated assault (§

6-2-502

) and escape (§§

6-5-206

and

6-1-304

) for a single violent escape attempt, which could have resulted in a single sentence under this section, did not violate double jeopardy constitutional provisions. Under the applicable statutory elements test, clearly different offenses were demonstrated, while the prosecutor had the requisite discretion to elect the charge or charges which could be brought based on the specific facts of the case. DeSpain v. State, 865 P.2d 584,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Rands v. State, 818 P.2d 44,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Peace officer's liability or liability on his bond for killing or injuring in preventing escape, 60 ALR2d 873.

Duress, necessity, or conditions of confinement as justification for escape from prison, 54 ALR5th 141.

§ 6-5-208.
Taking controlled substances or liquor into jails, penal institutions or mental hospitals; penalties.

Except as authorized by a person in charge, a person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both, if that person takes or passes any controlled substance or intoxicating liquor into a jail, a state penal institution, the Wyoming boys’ school, Wyoming girls’ school, a correctional facility operated by a private entity pursuant to W.S.

7-22-102

or the state hospital.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1989, ch. 40, § 1; 1991, ch. 89, § 2; ch. 252, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1998, ch. 7, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to alcoholic beverages, see title 12.

As to state institutions, see §

25-1-201

.

As to controlled substances, see §

35-7-1001

et seq.

Applicability of act. —

Laws 1991, ch. 252, § 3, provides: “The powers and authority set forth in this act shall be in addition to such other powers and authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming relating to correctional facilities or jails, and the requirements set forth in this act (including in particular, requirements relating to the obtaining of necessary consents and approvals) shall be deemed to apply only to actions taken or to be taken under authority of this act and shall not apply to any such other powers or authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming.”

Applicability of act. —

This section
applied to arrestees like defendant who carry controlled substances
into the booking areas of jails. Barrera v. State, 2017 WY 123, 403 P.3d 1025,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2017).

Section

35-7-1031

not a lesser included offense. —

Taking or passing controlled substances into a jail may be proven without necessarily proving possession of a controlled substance; therefore, possession of a controlled substance, in violation of § 35-7-1031(c), is not necessarily included in the offense of taking or passing a controlled substance into a jail in violation of §

6-5-208

.Paramo v. State, 896 P.2d 1342,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1995).

Felony drug offense. —

Defendant's prior state conviction under this section for taking or passing a controlled substance into a jail qualified as a felony drug offense for purposes of the mandatory life sentence enhancement under 21 U.S.C.S. § 841(b)(1)(A); the fact that this section also prohibited passing liquor into a jail did not prevent defendant's conviction for bringing methamphetamine into a jail from being a felony drug offense.
United States v. Yeley-Davis, 632 F.3d 673, 2011 U.S. App. LEXIS 1053 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 563 U.S. 969, 131 S. Ct. 2172, 179 L. Ed. 2d 951, 2011 U.S. LEXIS 3197 (U.S. 2011).

Relation to other statutes.—

District court did not err in denying defendant’s motion to dismiss a Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-5-208

charge where Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-5-213

did not repeal or clarify §

6-5-208

, but rather the two statutes were clearly intended to address different concerns. Farnsworth v. State, 2017 WY 137, 405 P.3d 1067,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2017).

There is no manifest repugnancy or irreconcilable conflict between Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-5-208

and

6-5-213

, and they can be read in harmony and as part of an overall and uniform system of jurisprudence. Farnsworth v. State, 2017 WY 137, 405 P.3d 1067,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited in

Lake v. State,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Jan 17, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Nature and elements of offense of conveying contraband to state prisoner, 64 ALR4th 902.

Validity and construction of prison regulation of inmates' possession of personal property, 66 ALR4th 800.

Validity, construction, and application of state statute criminalizing possession of contraband by individual in penal or correctional institution, 45 ALR5th 767.

§ 6-5-209.
Taking deadly weapons into jails, penal institutions, mental hospitals or courtrooms; penalties.

Except as authorized by a person in charge, a person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if that person takes or passes a deadly weapon into a jail, a state penal institution, the Wyoming boys’ school, Wyoming girls’ school, a correctional facility operated by a private entity pursuant to W.S.

7-22-102

or the state hospital.

Except as authorized by a presiding judge, a person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if that person takes into a courtroom a deadly weapon. Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this subsection within five (5) years of the first conviction shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a presiding judge from carrying a weapon or determining who may carry a weapon in the courtroom.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1991, ch. 89, § 2; ch. 252, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2013 ch. 160, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to state institutions, see §

25-1-201

.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, added (b) and (c), designating the provision as (a).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Nature and elements of offense of conveying contraband to state prisoner, 64 ALR4th 902.

Validity, construction, and application of state statute criminalizing possession of contraband by individual in penal or correctional institution, 45 ALR5th 767.

§ 6-5-210.
False reporting to authorities; penalties.

A person who knowingly reports falsely to a 911 emergency reporting system, law enforcement agency or a fire department that:

A crime has been committed is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both;

An emergency exists is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both;

An emergency exists, when the false report results in any person suffering serious bodily harm, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both;

An emergency exists, when the false report results in the death of any person, is guilty of manslaughter punishable as provided in W.S.

6-2-105

.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2013 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, added “911 emergency reporting system,” following “to a” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-211.
Injuring or killing a police dog, fire dog, search and rescue dog or police horse prohibited; penalties.

Any person who knowingly, willfully and without lawful cause or justification permanently disables or inflicts death upon any animal defined in subsection (b) of this section shall be liable for restitution by order of a court and shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

As used in this section:

“Police dog” means any dog that is owned, or the service of which is employed, by a law enforcement or corrections agency for the principal purpose of aiding in the detection of criminal activity, enforcement of laws or apprehension of offenders;

“Police horse” means any horse that is owned, or the service of which is employed, by a law enforcement or corrections agency for the principal purpose of aiding in the detection of criminal activity, enforcement of laws or apprehension of offenders;

“Fire dog” means any dog that is owned, or the service of which is employed, by a fire department, a special fire district or the state fire marshal for the principal purpose of aiding in the detection of flammable materials or the investigation of fires;

“Search and rescue dog” means any search and rescue dog that is owned, or the service of which is utilized, by a fire department, a law enforcement or corrections agency, a special fire district or the state fire marshal for the principal purpose of aiding in the detection of missing persons, including persons who are lost, who are trapped under debris as a result of a natural, manmade or technological disaster or who are drowning victims.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 205, § 1; 2007, ch. 69, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “permanently disables or inflicts death” for “inflicts serious bodily harm, permanent disability, or death,” and substituted “a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both” for “a misdemeanor”; and in (b), substituted “law enforcement or corrections agency” for “law enforcement agency” in (i), (ii), and (iv).

§ 6-5-212.
Interference with emergency calls; interference with emergency reporting system.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he knowingly obstructs, prevents, hinders or otherwise interferes with the making or completion of a telephone call to a 911 emergency reporting system or other telephone or radio communication by another person to any law enforcement agency to request protection or other assistance from the law enforcement agency or to report the commission of a crime.

A person commits a misdemeanor if he knowingly calls a 911 emergency reporting system for a purpose other than to report a situation that he reasonably believes requires prompt service in order to preserve or protect human life or health or property.

For purposes of this article “911 emergency reporting system” means as defined by W.S. 16-9-102(a)(iv).

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 48, § 1; 2013 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b); redesignated former (b) as (c); and substituted “article” for “section” in (c).

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 48, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

Cited

in

Scott v. State, 2012 WY 86, 278 P.3d 747,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 18, 2012).

§ 6-5-213.
Taking contraband into penal institutions or correctional facilities; definitions; penalties.

Except as authorized by a person in charge, no person shall:

Intentionally convey or attempt to convey contraband to a person confined in a penal institution or correctional facility; or

Intentionally make, obtain or possess contraband if the person is officially confined in a penal institution or correctional facility.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

As used in this section:

“Contraband” means:

Cellular telephone or other unauthorized electronic communications device;

Cigarette or other tobacco product;

Money;

Any tool or other item that may be used to facilitate escape from the custody of the penal institution or correctional facility; or

Any other item that the person confined in the official custody of a penal institution or correctional facility is prohibited by law from making, obtaining or possessing.

“Penal institution or correctional facility” means a jail, a state penal institution or a correctional facility operated by a private entity pursuant to W.S.

7-22-102

.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 70, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws, 2007, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Relation to other statutes.—

District court did not err in denying defendant’s motion to dismiss a Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-5-208

charge where Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-5-213

did not repeal or clarify §

6-5-208

, but rather the two statutes were clearly intended to address different concerns. Farnsworth v. State, 2017 WY 137, 405 P.3d 1067,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2017).

There is no manifest repugnancy or irreconcilable conflict between Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-5-208

and

6-5-213

, and they can be read in harmony and as part of an overall and uniform system of jurisprudence. Farnsworth v. State, 2017 WY 137, 405 P.3d 1067,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2017).